District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-601

Incorporation — Number; filing and recordation of certificate; content.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1280, ch. 854, § 574
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 30, 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-601.
1981 Ed., § 29-801.
1973 Ed., § 29-401.

Prior Codifications